Utah statutes.
76-9-103.   Disrupting a meeting or procession.

(1) A person is guilty of disrupting a meeting or procession if, intending to prevent or disrupt a lawful meeting, procession, or gathering, he obstructs or interferes with the meeting, procession, or gathering by physical action, verbal utterance, or any other means.

(2)  Disrupting a meeting or procession is a class B misdemeanor.

